California statutes. Education Code
(2) School districts shall comply with guidelines suggested by the Environmental Protection Agency for the purposes of inspection and testing for asbestos materials, and for the protection and safety of workers and all other individuals during the encapsulation and removal of asbestos.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1751, Sec. 9.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

49410.7.

(a) For purposes of funding pursuant to Section 39619.9, the factors determining the need for abatement of friable asbestos or potentially friable asbestos shall include, but not be limited to, visual inspection and bulk samples and air monitoring showing an airborne concentration of asbestos in the school building in excess of the standard 0.01 fibers/cc by Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) monitoring, as specified in subdivision (b), or the concurrently measured concentration of asbestos in the ambient air immediately adjacent to the building, whichever is higher. For purposes of reconstruction and rehabilitation projects approved pursuant to Chapter 22 (commencing with Section 17700) of Part 10 of the Education Code, for which asbestos abatement related work commenced on or after October 2, 1985, and for purposes of abating asbestos contained in pipe and block insulation, air monitoring shall not be required to determine the need for abatement of friable asbestos or potentially friable asbestos.

(b) For purposes of air monitoring, the operating agency for each public school building in which friable asbestos-containing materials (other than pipe and block insulation or materials to be abated during rehabilitation or reconstruction projects as specified in subdivision (a)) have been identified shall monitor airborne asbestos levels in each sampling area. Each sampling area in which asbestos-containing materials have been identified shall be monitored for at least eight hours during a period of normal building activity. Analysis of samples shall be by Transmission Electron Microscopy (TEM) methods, in accordance with the Environmental Protection Agency provisional method and update, to measure the number of observable asbestos fibers. The results of this monitoring shall be recorded in terms of the number of visible fibers greater than 1 micron in length per cubic centimeter of air (f/cc) in accord with standard definitions for asbestos monitoring established by the Occupational Safety and Health Administration.

“Sampling area,” as used in this section, means any area, whether contiguous or not, within a building that contains friable material that is homogenous in texture and appearance.

(c) Any public primary or secondary school building in which asbestos abatement work has been performed shall not be reoccupied until air monitoring has been conducted to show that the airborne concentration of asbestos does not exceed the air monitoring standard of subdivision (a). Not less than one month after the reoccupancy of the school building where asbestos abatement work has occurred, the building shall be remonitored to determine compliance with subdivision (b). 

(d) “School building,” as used in this section, means any of the following: 

(1) Structures used for the instruction of public school children, including classrooms, laboratories, libraries, research facilities, and administrative facilities.

(2) School eating facilities and school kitchens.

(3) Gymnasiums or other facilities used for athletic or recreational activities or for courses in physical education.

(4) Dormitories or other living areas of residential schools.

(5) Maintenance, storage, or utility facilities essential to the operation of the facilities described in paragraphs (1) to (4).

(e) School districts and county offices of education may apply for reimbursement from the Asbestos Abatement Fund for the costs of air monitoring completed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1254, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

49411.

(a) The State Department of Education, in cooperation with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health within the Department of Industrial Relations, shall formulate a listing of chemical compounds used in school programs that includes the potential hazards and estimated shelf life of each compound.

(b) The Superintendent of Public Instruction, in cooperation with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health within the Department of Industrial Relations, shall develop guidelines for school districts for the regular removal and disposal of all chemicals whose estimated shelf life has elapsed.

(c) The county superintendent of schools may implement a system for disposing of chemicals from schools within the county or may permit school districts to arrange for the disposal of the chemicals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

49412.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), counties and school districts, in the utilization of funds allocated pursuant to any appropriation from any account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund for the provision of health care to school populations, shall give initial consideration to the use of those of credentialed school nurses and school nurse practitioners employed by the school districts, to the extent those services are within the scope of practice of those nurses, and to the extent these purposes are consistent with the Tobacco Tax and Health Protection Act of 1988 and Chapter 1331 of the Statutes of 1989.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to funds appropriated from the Health Education Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund, except for purposes of providing health screenings through the Child Health and Disability Prevention Screening program.

(c) Any county which, after the initial consideration regarding the utilization of funds, as required by subdivision (a), elects to utilize funds to which subdivisions (a) and (b) apply for the credentialed school nurses and school nurse practitioners employed by school districts may allocate those funds to the school districts for those purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 51, Sec. 1.   Effective April 18, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

49413.

(a) The Legislature recognizes the importance of first aid and cardiopulmonary resuscitation training. In enacting this section, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage school districts and schools, individually or jointly, to develop a program whereby their staff and pupils understand the importance of this training and have an appropriate opportunity to develop these skills.

(b) A school district or school, individually or jointly with another school district or school, may provide a comprehensive program in first aid or cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) training, or both, to pupils and employees. The program shall be developed using the following guidelines:

(1) The school district or school collaborates with existing local resources, including, but not limited to, parent teacher associations, hospitals, school nurses, fire departments, and other local agencies that promote safety, to make first aid or CPR training, or both, available to the pupils and employees of the school district or school.

(2) Each school district that develops a program, or the school district that has jurisdiction over a school that develops a program, compiles a list of resources for first aid or CPR information, to be distributed to all of the schools in the district.

(3) The first aid and CPR training are based on standards that are at least equivalent to the standards currently used by the American Red Cross or the American Heart Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 750, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.

(a) Local educational agencies shall provide emergency epinephrine delivery systems, to be stored at each schoolsite, including at the location of any childcare program operated by or under contract with the local educational agency, in an accessible location upon need for emergency use, to school nurses or trained personnel who have volunteered pursuant to subdivision (d), or to childcare employees who have volunteered, received training, and are subject to liability limitations pursuant to Section 1596.7985 of the Health and Safety Code, and school nurses, trained personnel, and childcare employees may use epinephrine delivery systems to provide emergency medical aid to persons suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an anaphylactic
 reaction.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Anaphylaxis” means a potentially life-threatening hypersensitivity to a substance.

(A) Symptoms of anaphylaxis may include shortness of breath, wheezing, difficulty breathing, difficulty talking or swallowing, hives, itching, swelling, shock, or asthma.

(B) Causes of anaphylaxis may include, but are not limited to, an insect sting, a food allergy, a drug reaction, or exercise.

(2) “Authorizing physician and surgeon” may include, but is not limited to, a physician and surgeon employed by, or contracting with, a local
 educational agency, a medical director of the local health department, or a local emergency medical services director.

(3) “Childcare program” means a state or federally subsidized childcare program operated by, or under contract with, the local educational agency, including, but not limited to, a California state preschool program or Head Start program pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1, or a childcare program, including, but not limited to, general childcare and development programs pursuant to Part 1.8 (commencing with Section 10207) of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(4) “Epinephrine delivery system” means a disposable delivery
 system designed for the delivery of a premeasured dose of epinephrine into the human body to prevent or treat a life-threatening allergic reaction.

(5) “Local educational agency” means a school operated by a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(6) “Qualified supervisor of health” may include, but is not limited to, a school nurse.

(7) “Volunteer” or “trained personnel” means an employee or a holder of an Activity Supervisor Clearance Certificate pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 44258.7, who has volunteered to administer epinephrine delivery systems to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from anaphylaxis,
 has been designated by a school, and has received training pursuant to subdivision (d), or employees of a childcare program operated by or under contract with a local educational agency, who have volunteered, received training, and are subject to liability limitations pursuant to Section 1596.7985 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) Each private school in the state may voluntarily determine whether or not to make emergency epinephrine delivery systems and trained personnel available at its school. In making this determination, a school shall evaluate the emergency medical response time to the school and determine whether initiating emergency medical services is an acceptable alternative to epinephrine delivery systems and trained personnel. A private school choosing to exercise the authority provided under this subdivision shall
 not receive state funds specifically for purposes of this subdivision.

(d) Each public and private school in the state may designate one or more volunteers to receive initial and annual refresher training, based on the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (e), regarding the storage and emergency use of an epinephrine delivery system from the school nurse or other qualified person designated by an authorizing physician and surgeon.

(e) (1) Every five years, or sooner as deemed necessary by the Superintendent, the Superintendent shall review minimum standards of training for the administration of epinephrine delivery systems that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2). For purposes of this subdivision, the Superintendent shall consult with organizations
 and providers with expertise in administering epinephrine delivery systems and administering medication in a school environment, including, but not limited to, the State Department of Public Health, the Emergency Medical Services Authority, the American Academy of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the California School Nurses Organization, the California Medical Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, Food Allergy Research and Education, the California Society of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the American College of Allergy, Asthma and Immunology, the Sean N. Parker Center for Allergy Research, and others.

(2) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:

(A) Techniques for recognizing symptoms of anaphylaxis.

(B) Standards and procedures for the storage, restocking, and emergency use of epinephrine delivery systems.

(C) Emergency followup procedures, including calling the emergency 911 telephone number and contacting, if possible, the pupil’s parent and physician.

(D) Recommendations on the necessity of instruction and certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(E) Instruction on how to determine which epinephrine delivery system to use, which shall include consideration of the age of the person suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an anaphylactic reaction as a guideline of equivalency for the person’s weight determination.

(F) Written materials covering the information required under this subdivision.

(3) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the most recent Voluntary Guidelines for Managing Food Allergies In Schools and Early Care and Education Programs published by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention and the most recent guidelines for medication administration issued by the department.

(4) A school shall retain for reference the written materials prepared under subparagraph (F) of paragraph (2). A copy of these written materials shall be made accessible, such as through publicly posting at the location of the epinephrine delivery systems.

(f) A local educational agency shall distribute a notice at least once per school year to all staff that contains the following information:

(1) A description of the volunteer request stating that the request is for volunteers to be trained to administer an epinephrine delivery system to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from anaphylaxis, as specified in subdivision (b).

(2) A description of the training that the volunteer will receive pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) The location of the epinephrine delivery system at each schoolsite.

(g) (1) A qualified supervisor of health at a local
 educational agency shall obtain from an authorizing physician and surgeon a prescription for each schoolsite for epinephrine delivery systems that, at a minimum, includes appropriate doses of available epinephrine delivery systems for the ages and weights of individuals at the schoolsite and those participating in any childcare program operated by or under contract with the local educational agency. A qualified supervisor of health at a local educational agency shall be responsible for stocking the epinephrine delivery system and restocking it if it is used.

(2) If a local educational agency does not have a qualified supervisor of health, an administrator at the local educational agency shall carry out the duties specified in paragraph (1).

(3) A prescription pursuant to this
 subdivision may be filled by local or mail order pharmacies or epinephrine delivery system manufacturers.

(4) An authorizing physician and surgeon shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for the issuance of a prescription or order pursuant to this section, unless the physician and surgeon’s issuance of the prescription or order constitutes gross negligence or willful or malicious conduct.

(h) A school nurse or, if the schoolsite does not have a school nurse or the school nurse is not onsite or available, a volunteer, may administer an epinephrine delivery system to a person
 exhibiting potentially life-threatening symptoms of anaphylaxis at school or a school activity or program operated by or under contract with the local educational agency when a physician is not immediately available. If an epinephrine delivery system is used, it shall be restocked as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than two weeks after it is used. Epinephrine delivery systems shall be restocked before their expiration date.

(i) A volunteer shall initiate emergency medical services or other appropriate medical followup in accordance with the training materials retained pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (e).

(j) A local educational agency shall ensure that each employee who volunteers under this section will be provided defense and indemnification by the
 local educational agency for any and all civil liability, in accordance with, but not limited to, that provided in Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code. This information shall be reduced to writing, provided to the volunteer, and retained in the volunteer’s personnel file.

(k) A state agency, the department, or a local educational agency may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source for the support of the local educational agency carrying out the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of epinephrine delivery systems from a manufacturer or wholesaler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 322, Sec. 2.   (SB 568)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following apply:

(1) “Cannabis” has the same meaning as in Section 11018 of the Health and Safety Code. “Cannabis” includes cannabis products.

(2) “Cannabis products” has the same meaning as in Section 11018.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Medicinal cannabis” excludes medicinal cannabis or cannabis products in a smokeable or vapeable form.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 11357 and 11361 of the Health and Safety Code, the governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school
 maintaining kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, may adopt, at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board or body, a policy that allows a parent or guardian of a pupil to possess and administer medicinal cannabis at a schoolsite to the pupil who is a qualified patient pursuant to Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 11362.7) of Chapter 6 of Division 10 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The policy shall include, at a minimum, all of the following elements:

(1) The parent or guardian shall not administer the medicinal cannabis in a manner that disrupts the educational environment or exposes other pupils.

(2) After the parent or guardian administers the medicinal cannabis, the parent or guardian shall remove any remaining medicinal cannabis from the schoolsite.

(3) The parent or guardian shall sign in at the schoolsite before administering the medicinal cannabis.

(4) Before administering the medicinal cannabis, the parent or guardian shall provide to an employee of the school a valid written medical recommendation for medicinal cannabis for the pupil to be kept on file at the school.

(d) For purposes of confidentiality and disclosure, pupil records collected in accordance with a policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (b) for the purpose of administering medicinal cannabis to a pupil shall be treated as medical records and shall be subject to all provisions of state and federal law that govern the confidentiality and disclosure of medical records.

(e) The governing board of a school district, a county board of
 education, or the governing body of a charter school that adopts a policy pursuant to subdivision (b) may amend or rescind the policy at a regularly scheduled meeting of the governing board or body for any reason, including, but not limited to, if the school district, county office of education, or charter school is at risk of, or has lost, federal funding as a result of the policy.

(f) The governing board of a school district, a county board of education, or the governing body of a charter school that adopts a policy pursuant to subdivision (b) may amend or rescind the policy at a special meeting in compliance with Section 54956 of the Government Code if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) Exigent circumstances necessitate an immediate change to the policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) At the
 meeting the governing board or body will address the intent to amend or rescind the policy adopted pursuant to subdivision (b).

(g) This section does not require the staff of a school district, county office of education, or charter school to administer medicinal cannabis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 80.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.2.

(a) The department shall create the California Food Allergy Resource internet web page to provide voluntary guidance to local educational agencies to help protect pupils with food allergies. In creating the internet web page,
 the department shall ensure all of the following:

(1) The focus of the internet web page is to provide local educational agencies, caregivers, and pupils practical information, planning steps, and strategies for reducing allergic reactions to food within schools and early education centers.

(2) The internet web page includes a link to the most recent version of the federal Centers for Disease Control and
 Prevention “Voluntary Guidelines for Managing Food Allergies in Schools and Early Care Education Programs,” as well as other relevant resources, which may include, but are not limited to, best practices fact sheets produced by the Institute of Child Nutrition.

(3) A summary of the specific state laws relevant to the issue of pupils with food allergies in schools are included to serve as a complement to the federal laws and regulations included in the federal guidelines identified in paragraph (2).

(b) The content of the
 California Food Allergy Resource internet web page shall include, at a minimum, all of the following:

(1) A compilation of state and federal resources available for pupils with food allergies.

(2) Methods and qualifications necessary for pupils, or their parents and guardians, to initiate individualized food allergy management and prevention plans.

(3) Potential strategies
 to minimize the risk of food allergy anaphylaxis in school.

(4) Methods to obtain ingredient lists for foods served to pupils at school from each of the school’s food service providers.

(c) A local educational agency is encouraged to consult the internet web page created pursuant to this section and use it as an equitable resource to ensure the inclusiveness of pupils with food allergies at school and is encouraged to make it available 
 annually to pupils, parents, and guardians.

(d) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, and charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 794, Sec. 2.   (AB 2640)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.3.

(a) School districts, county offices of education, and charter schools may provide emergency naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to school nurses or trained personnel who have volunteered pursuant to subdivision (d), and school nurses or trained personnel may use naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to provide emergency medical aid to persons suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an opioid overdose.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Authorizing physician and surgeon” may include, but is not
 limited to, a physician and surgeon employed by, or contracting with, a local educational agency, a medical director of the local health department, or a local emergency medical services director.

(2) “Auto-injector” means a disposable delivery device designed for the automatic injection of a premeasured dose of an opioid antagonist into the human body and approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration for layperson use.

(3) “Opioid antagonist” means naloxone hydrochloride or another drug approved by the federal Food and Drug Administration that, when administered, negates or neutralizes in whole or in part the pharmacological effects of an opioid in the body, and has been approved for the treatment of an opioid overdose.

(4) “Qualified supervisor of health” may include, but is not limited to, a school nurse.

(5) “Volunteer” or “trained personnel” means an employee who has volunteered to administer naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an opioid overdose, has been designated by a school, and has received training pursuant to subdivision (d).

(c) Each public and private elementary and secondary school in the state may voluntarily determine whether or not to make emergency naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist and trained personnel available at its school. In making this determination, a school shall evaluate the emergency medical response time to the school and determine whether
 initiating emergency medical services is an acceptable alternative to naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist and trained personnel.
 A private elementary or secondary school choosing to exercise the authority provided under this subdivision shall not receive state funds specifically for purposes of this subdivision.

(d) (1) Each public and private elementary and secondary school in the state may designate one or more volunteers to receive initial and annual refresher training, based on the standards developed pursuant to subdivision (e), regarding the storage and emergency use of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist from the school nurse or other qualified person designated by an authorizing physician and surgeon. A benefit shall not be granted to or withheld from any individual based on his or her offer to
 volunteer, and there shall be no retaliation against any individual for rescinding his or her offer to volunteer, including after receiving training. Any school district, county office of education, or charter school choosing to exercise the authority provided under this subdivision shall provide the training for the volunteers at no cost to the volunteer and during the volunteer’s regular working hours.

(2) An employee who volunteers pursuant to this section may rescind his or her offer to administer emergency naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist at any time, including after receipt of training.

(e) (1) The Superintendent shall establish minimum standards of training for the administration of naloxone hydrochloride
 or another opioid antagonist that satisfies the requirements of paragraph (2). Every five years, or sooner as deemed necessary by the Superintendent, the Superintendent shall review minimum standards of training for the administration of naloxone hydrochloride or other opioid antagonists that satisfy the requirements of paragraph (2). For purposes of this subdivision, the Superintendent shall consult with organizations and providers with expertise in administering naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist and administering medication in a school environment, including, but not limited to, the California Society of Addiction Medicine, the Emergency Medical Services Authority, the California
 School Nurses Organization, the California Medical Association, the American Academy of Pediatrics, and others.

(2) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:

(A) Techniques for recognizing symptoms of an opioid overdose.

(B) Standards and procedures for the storage, restocking, and emergency use of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist.

(C) Basic emergency followup procedures, including, but not limited to, a requirement for the school or charter school administrator or, if the administrator is not available, another school staff member to call the emergency 911 telephone number and to contact
 the pupil’s parent or guardian.

(D) Recommendations on the necessity of instruction and certification in cardiopulmonary resuscitation.

(E) Written materials covering the information required under this subdivision.

(3) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall be consistent with the most recent guidelines for medication administration issued by the department.

(4) A school shall retain for reference the written materials prepared under subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2).

(5) The department shall include on its Internet Web site a clearinghouse for best practices in training nonmedical personnel to administer naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to pupils.

(f) Any school district, county office of education, or charter school electing to utilize naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist for emergency aid shall distribute a notice at least once per school year to all staff that contains the following information:

(1) A description of the volunteer request stating that the request is for volunteers to be trained to administer naloxone hydrochloride or
 another opioid antagonist to a person if the person is suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an opioid overdose.

(2) A description of the training that the volunteer will receive pursuant to subdivision (d).

(3) The right of an employee to rescind his or her offer to
 volunteer pursuant to this section.

(4) A statement that no benefit will be granted to or withheld from any individual based on his or her offer to volunteer and that there will be no retaliation against any individual for rescinding his or her offer to volunteer, including after receiving training.

(g) (1) A qualified supervisor of health at a school district, county office of education, or charter school electing to utilize naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist for emergency aid shall obtain from an authorizing physician and surgeon a prescription for each school for naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist. A qualified supervisor of health at a school district, county office of education, or charter school shall be responsible
 for stocking the naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist and restocking it if it is used.

(2) If a school district, county office of education, or charter school does not have a qualified supervisor of health, an administrator at the school district, county office of education, or charter school shall carry out the duties specified in paragraph (1).

(3) A prescription pursuant to this subdivision may be filled by local or mail order pharmacies or naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist manufacturers.

(4) An authorizing physician and surgeon shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for the issuance of a prescription or order pursuant
 to this section, unless the physician and surgeon’s issuance of the prescription or order constitutes gross negligence or willful or malicious conduct.

(h) (1) A school nurse or, if the school does not have a school nurse or the school nurse is not onsite or available, a volunteer may administer naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist to a person exhibiting potentially life-threatening symptoms of an opioid overdose at school or a school activity when a physician is not immediately available. If the naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist is used it shall be restocked as soon as reasonably possible, but no later than two weeks after it is used. Naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist shall be restocked before its expiration date.

(2) Volunteers may administer naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist only by nasal spray or by auto-injector.

(3) A volunteer shall be allowed to administer naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist in a form listed in paragraph (2) that the volunteer is most comfortable with.

(i) A school district, county office of education, or charter school electing to utilize naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist for emergency aid shall ensure that each employee who volunteers under this section will be provided defense and indemnification by the school district, county office of education, or charter school for any and all civil liability, in accordance with, but not limited to, that provided in Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of
 Title 1 of the Government Code. This information shall be reduced to writing, provided to the volunteer, and retained in the volunteer’s personnel file.

(j) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, a person trained as required under subdivision (d), who administers naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist, in good faith and not for compensation, to a person who appears to be experiencing an opioid overdose shall not be subject to professional review, be liable in a civil action, or be subject to criminal prosecution for his or her acts or omissions in administering the naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist.

(2) The protection specified in paragraph (1) shall not apply in a case of gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct of the
 person who renders emergency care treatment by the use of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist.

(3) Any public employee who volunteers to administer naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist pursuant to subdivision (d) is not providing emergency medical care “for compensation,” notwithstanding the fact that he or she is a paid public employee.

(k) A state agency, the department, or a public school may accept gifts, grants, and donations from any source for the support of the public school carrying out the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, the acceptance of naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist from a manufacturer or wholesaler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 557, Sec. 2.   (AB 1748)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.35.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a local educational agency shall not prohibit a pupil 12 years of age or older, while on a schoolsite or participating in school activities, from carrying or administering, for the purposes of providing emergency treatment to persons who are suffering, or reasonably believed to be suffering, from an opioid overdose, naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a pupil 12 years of age or older of a local educational agency who administers naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist on a schoolsite or while participating in school activities, in good faith and not for compensation, to a person who appears to be experiencing an opioid
 overdose shall not be liable in a civil action or be subject to criminal prosecution for their acts or omissions in administering the naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist, unless the pupil’s acts or omissions constitute gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct connected to the administration of the naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law or regulation, a local educational agency, or an employee of a local educational agency, shall not be subject to professional review, liable in a civil action, or subject to criminal prosecution for a pupil’s acts or omissions in administering naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist, unless an act or omission of the local educational agency, or the employee of the local educational agency, constitutes gross negligence or willful and wanton misconduct connected to the administration of the naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid
 antagonist.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

 (1) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(2) “Naloxone hydrochloride or another opioid antagonist” means either of the following:

(A) A naloxone hydrochloride nasal spray that is federally approved for over-the-counter, nonprescription use.

(B) Any other opioid overdose reversal medication that is federally approved for over-the-counter, nonprescription use.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.   (AB 2998)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.4.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, as part of a restorative justice framework, a school use alternatives to a referral of a pupil to a law enforcement agency in response to an incident involving the pupil’s misuse of an opioid, to the extent not in conflict with any other law requiring that referral.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the Multi-Tiered System of Supports, which includes restorative justice practices, trauma-informed practices, social and emotional learning, and schoolwide positive behavior interventions and support, may be used to achieve the alternatives described in subdivision (a), in order to help pupils gain critical social and emotional skills, receive support to help transform trauma-related
 responses, understand the impact of their actions, and develop meaningful methods for repairing harm to the school community.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 856, Sec. 5.   (SB 10)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49414.5.

(a) In the absence of a credentialed school nurse or other licensed nurse onsite at the school, each school district may provide school personnel with voluntary emergency medical training to provide emergency medical assistance to pupils with diabetes suffering from severe hypoglycemia, and volunteer personnel shall provide this emergency care, in accordance with standards established pursuant to subdivision (b) and the performance instructions set forth by the licensed health care provider of the pupil. A school employee who does not volunteer or who has not been trained pursuant to subdivision (b) may not be required to provide emergency medical assistance pursuant to this subdivision.

(b) (1) The Legislature encourages the American Diabetes Association to develop performance standards for the training and supervision of school personnel in providing emergency medical assistance to pupils with diabetes suffering from severe hypoglycemia. The performance standards shall be developed in cooperation with the department, the California School Nurses Organization, the California Medical Association, and the American Academy of Pediatrics. Upon the development of the performance standards pursuant to this paragraph, the State Department of Health Services’ Diabetes Prevention and Control Program shall approve the performance standards for distribution and make those standards available upon request.

(2) Training established pursuant to this subdivision shall include all of the following:
